Massachusetts, session 194th, H3839.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 2 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following section:-
Section 64. (a) The Honor and Remember Flag created by Honor and Remember, Inc.
shall be designated as the symbol of the Commonwealth’s concern and commitment to honoring
and remembering the lives of all members of the United States Armed Forces who have lost their
lives while serving, or as a result of service, and their families. The Honor and Remember Flag’s
red field shall represent the blood shed by brave men and women who sacrificed their lives for
freedom; the Flag’s white field and border shall recognize the purity of that sacrifice; the Flag’s
blue star shall be a symbol of the active service in military conflicts that dates back to World
War I; the Flag’s gold star shall signify the ultimate sacrifice of a warrior in active service who
of 3

will not return home and shall reflect the value of the life given; the folded Flag shall highlight
this nation’s final tribute to a fallen service member and a family’s sacrifice; and the Flag’s
flame shall symbolize the eternal spirit of the departed. The Flag shall be a unifying symbol
recognizing this nation’s solemn debt to the estimated 1.6 million fallen service members
throughout history and the families and communities who mourn their loss.
(b) When flown on the same pole or pole formation as other flags, The Honor and
Remember flag shall be flown beneath any American Flag, flag of the Commonwealth, or
Prisoners of War/Missing in Action flag that may also be flown on said pole or formation. The
Honor and Remember flag shall never be larger than the American flag flown on the same pole
or in the same formation of poles.
(c) The Honor and Remember Flag should be in good condition if flown, free from rips,
stains, or significant fading.
(d) The Honor and Remember Flag shall be displayed by those wishing to honor and
remember the lives of all members of the United States Armed Forces who have lost their lives
while serving, or as a result of service, and their families on the following days:
(1) Armed Forces Day, the third Saturday in May;
(2) Memorial Day, the last Monday in May;
(3) Flag Day, June 14;
(4) The Fourth of July;
(5) National POW/MIA Recognition Day;
of 3

(6) Veterans Day, November 11;
(7) Gold Star Mother's Day, the last Sunday of September; and
(8) Whenever there is a military casualty in the Commonwealth.
(e) Nothing in this act shall be interpreted as a mandate to purchase or display an Honor
and Remember flag by any individual, organization, municipality, or agency.
of 3